Idaho statutes. Title 16 JUVENILE PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 16 CHILD PROTECTIVE ACT
§ 16-1616. Investigation.

After a petition has been filed, the department shall investigate the circumstances of the child and his family and prepare a written report to the court.

The report shall be delivered to the court with copies to each of the parties prior to the pretrial conference for the adjudicatory hearing. If delivered by mail the report must be received by the court and the parties prior to the pretrial conference for the adjudicatory hearing. The report shall contain a social evaluation of the child and the parents or other legal custodian and such other information as the court shall require.

The report shall not be considered by the court for purposes of determining whether the child comes within the jurisdiction of the act. The report may be admitted into evidence at the adjudicatory hearing for other purposes.

§ 16-1617. Investigation by multidisciplinary teams.

The prosecuting attorney in each county shall be responsible for the development of an interagency multidisciplinary team or teams for investigation of child abuse and neglect referrals within each county. The teams shall consist of, but not be limited to, law enforcement personnel, department of health and welfare child protection risk assessment staff, child advocacy center staff where such staff is available in the county, a representative of the prosecuting attorney’s office, and any other person deemed to be necessary due to his or her special training in child abuse investigation. Other persons may participate in investigation of particular cases at the invitation of the team and as determined necessary, such as medical personnel, school officials, mental health workers, personnel from domestic violence programs, persons knowledgeable about adaptive equipment and supportive services for parents or guardians with disabilities or the guardian ad litem program.

The teams shall develop a written protocol for investigation of child abuse cases and for interviewing alleged victims of such abuse or neglect, including protocols for investigations involving a family member with a disability. Each team shall develop written agreements signed by member agencies, specifying the role of each agency, procedures to be followed to assess risks to the child and criteria and procedures to be followed to ensure the child victim’s safety including removal of the alleged offender.

Each team member shall be trained in his or her respective role, including risk assessment, dynamics of child abuse and interviewing and investigatory techniques. Such training may be provided by the Idaho network of children’s advocacy centers or by the member’s respective agency.

Each team shall classify, assess and review a representative selection of cases referred to either the department or to law enforcement entities for investigation of child abuse or neglect.

Each multidisciplinary team shall develop policies that provide for an independent review of investigation procedures utilized in cases upon completion of any court actions on those cases. The procedures shall include independent citizen input. Nonoffending parents of child abuse victims shall be notified of the review procedure.

Prosecuting attorneys of the various counties may determine that multidisciplinary teams may be most effectively established through the use of joint exercise of powers agreements among more than one (1) county and such agreements are hereby authorized.

Lack of review by a multidisciplinary team of a particular case does not defeat the jurisdiction of the court.

§ 16-1618. Investigative interviews of alleged child abuse victims.

Unless otherwise demonstrated by good cause, all investigative or risk assessment interviews of alleged victims of child abuse will be documented by audio or video taping whether conducted by personnel of law enforcement entities, the department of health and welfare or child advocacy centers. The absence of such audio or video taping shall not limit the admissibility of such evidence in any related court proceeding.

§ 16-1619. Adjudicatory hearing — Conduct of hearing — Consolidation.

When a petition has been filed, the court shall set an adjudicatory hearing to be held no later than thirty (30) days after the filing of the petition.

A pretrial conference shall be held outside the presence of the court within three (3) to five (5) days before the adjudicatory hearing. Investigative reports required under section 16-1616, Idaho Code, shall be delivered to the court with copies to each of the parents and other legal custodians, guardian ad litem and attorney for the child prior to the pretrial conference.

At the adjudicatory hearing, parents or guardians with disabilities shall have the right to introduce admissible evidence regarding how use of adaptive equipment or supportive services may enable the parent or guardian to carry out the responsibilities of parenting the child by addressing the reason for the removal of the child.

If a preponderance of the evidence at the adjudicatory hearing shows that the child comes within the court’s jurisdiction under this chapter upon the grounds set forth in section 16-1603, Idaho Code, the court shall so decree and in its decree shall make a finding on the record of the facts and conclusions of law upon which it exercises jurisdiction over the child.

Upon entering its decree, the court shall consider any information relevant to the disposition of the child but in any event shall:

Place the child under the protective supervision of the department for an indeterminate period not to exceed the child’s eighteenth birthday; or

Vest legal custody in the department or other authorized agency subject to residual parental rights and subject to full judicial review by the court and, when contested by any party, judicial approval of all matters relating to the custody of the child by the department or other authorized agency.

If the court vests legal custody in the department or other authorized agency, the court shall make detailed written findings based on facts in the record that, in addition to the findings required in subsection (4) of this section, continuation of residence in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child and that vesting legal custody with the department or other authorized agency would be in the best interests of the child. In addition, the court shall make detailed written findings based on facts in the record as to whether the department made reasonable efforts to prevent the placement of the child in foster care, including findings, when appropriate, that:

Reasonable efforts were made but were not successful in eliminating the need for foster care placement of the child;

The department made reasonable efforts to prevent removal but was not able to safely provide preventive services;

Reasonable efforts to temporarily place the child with related persons were made but were not successful; or

Reasonable efforts to reunify the child with one (1) or both parents were not required because aggravated circumstances were present. If aggravated circumstances are found, a permanency hearing for the child shall be held within thirty (30) days of the determination of aggravated circumstances.

The court shall also inquire regarding:
(7)(a) The court shall also inquire regarding:

Whether there is reason to believe that the child is an Indian child;
(ii) The efforts that have been made since the last hearing to determine whether the child is an Indian child; and

The department’s efforts to work with all tribes of which the child may be a member to verify whether the child is a member or eligible for membership.

In addition, if the court vests legal custody of the child in the department or other authorized agency, the court shall inquire as to:

If the child is of school age, the department’s efforts to keep the child in the school at which the child is currently enrolled; and

If a sibling group was removed from the home, the department’s efforts to place the siblings together, or if the department has not placed or will not be placing the siblings together, about a plan to ensure frequent visitation or ongoing interaction among the siblings, unless visitation or ongoing interaction would be contrary to the safety or well-being of one (1) or more of the siblings.

The court shall inquire about and may make any additional inquiry relevant to the use of psychotropic medications.

If the court vests legal custody of the child in the department or other authorized agency and the child is being treated with psychotropic medication, these additional requirements shall apply:

The department shall report to the court the medications and dosages prescribed for the child and the medical professional who prescribed the medication; and

A decree vesting legal custody in the department shall be binding upon the department and may continue until the child’s eighteenth birthday.

A decree vesting legal custody in an authorized agency other than the department shall be for a period of time not to exceed the child’s eighteenth birthday and on such other terms as the court shall state in its decree to be in the best interests of the child and which the court finds to be acceptable to such authorized agency.

In order to preserve the unity of the family system and to ensure the best interests of the child, whether issuing an order of protective supervision or an order of legal custody, the court may consider extending or initiating a protective order as part of the decree. The protective order shall be determined as in the best interests of the child and upon a showing of continuing danger to the child. The conditions and terms of the protective order shall be clearly stated in the decree.

If the court does not find that the child comes within the jurisdiction of this chapter pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, it shall dismiss the petition.

Where legal custody of a child is vested in the department, any party or counsel for a child may, at or after the disposition phase of an adjudicatory hearing, file and serve a written motion to contest matters relating to the placement of the child by the department. The hearing must be held no later than thirty (30) days from the date the motion was filed. If the court approves the placement, the court shall enter an order denying the motion. If the court does not approve the placement, the court shall enter an order directing the department to identify and implement an alternative placement in accordance with applicable law. The court shall consider everything necessary or proper in the best interests of the children. The court shall consider all relevant factors, which may include:

The wishes of the child regarding the child’s custodian;

The wishes of the child’s parent or parents regarding the child’s custody, if appropriate;

The interaction and interrelationship of the child with his parent or parents or foster parent or foster parents, and the child’s siblings;

The child’s adjustment to his home, school and community;

The character and circumstances of all individuals involved;

The need to promote continuity and stability in the life of the child; and

A history of domestic violence as defined in section 39-6303, Idaho Code, whether or not in the presence of the child, or a conviction for lewd and lascivious conduct or felony injury to a child.

§ 16-1620. Finding of aggravated circumstances — Permanency plan — Hearing.

After a judicial determination that reasonable efforts to return the child to his home are not required because aggravated circumstances were found to be present, the court shall hold a permanency hearing within thirty (30) days after the finding, and every twelve (12) months thereafter for as long as the court has jurisdiction. The department shall prepare a permanency plan and file the permanency plan with the court at least five (5) days prior to the permanency hearing. If the permanency plan has a goal of termination of parental rights and adoption, the department shall file the petition to terminate as required in section 16-1624(2), Idaho Code. Copies of the permanency plan shall be delivered to the parents and other legal guardians, prosecuting attorney or deputy attorney general, the guardian ad litem and attorney for the child.

The permanency plan shall have a permanency goal of termination of parental rights and adoption, guardianship or, for youth age sixteen (16) years and older only, another planned permanent living arrangement and shall set forth the reasonable efforts necessary to finalize the permanency goal.

The permanency plan shall also:

Identify the services to be provided to the child, including services to identify and meet any educational, emotional, physical or developmental needs the child may have, to assist the child in adjusting to the placement or to ensure the stability of the placement;

Address all options for permanent placement of the child, including consideration of options for in-state and out-of-state placement of the child;

Address the advantages and disadvantages of each option and include a recommendation as to which option is in the child’s best interest;

Specifically identify the actions necessary to implement the recommended option;

Specifically set forth a schedule for accomplishing the actions necessary to implement the permanency goal;

Address the options for maintaining the child’s connection to the community, including individuals with a significant relationship to the child, and organizations or community activities with which the child has a significant connection. This shall also include the efforts made to ensure educational stability for the child, the efforts to keep the child in the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement or the reasons why remaining in that school is not in the best interests of the child;

Document that siblings were placed together, or if siblings were not placed together, document the efforts made to place siblings together, the reasons why siblings were not placed together, and a plan for ensuring frequent visitation or ongoing interaction between the siblings, unless visitation or ongoing interaction would be contrary to the safety or well-being of one (1) or more of the siblings;

For youth age fourteen (14) years and older:

Identify the services needed to assist the youth to make the transition from foster care to successful adulthood; and
(ii) Document the youth’s rights in regard to his education, health, visitation, court participation and receipt of an annual credit report, including a signed acknowledgment by the department that the youth was provided with a written copy of these rights and that the rights were explained to the youth in an age or developmentally appropriate manner;

For youth age sixteen (16) years and older with a proposed permanency goal of another planned permanent living arrangement, document:

The intensive, ongoing, and as of the date of the hearing, unsuccessful efforts made to place the youth with a parent, in an adoptive placement, in a guardianship, or in the legal custody of the department in a placement with a fit and willing relative, including an adult sibling;

Why another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the youth and compelling reasons why, as of the date of the permanency hearing, it would not be in the best interest of the youth to be placed permanently with a parent, in an adoptive placement, in a guardianship, or in the legal custody of the department in a placement with a fit and willing relative, including an adult sibling;

The steps that the department has taken to ensure that the youth’s foster parents or child care institution are following the reasonable and prudent parent standard when determining whether to allow the youth in their care to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural and social activities; and

The opportunities provided to the youth to engage in age or developmentally appropriate activities;

If there is reason to believe the child is an Indian child and there has been no final determination as to the child’s status as an Indian child, document:

The efforts made to determine whether the child is an Indian child; and

The department’s efforts to work with all tribes of which the child may be a member to verify whether the child is a member or eligible for membership; and

Identify the prospective adoptive parents, if known; if the prospective adoptive parents are not known, the department shall amend the plan to name the proposed adoptive parents as soon as such persons become known.

The court shall hold a permanency hearing to determine whether the best interest of the child is served by adopting, rejecting or modifying the permanency plan proposed by the department. At each permanency hearing:

For youth age twelve (12) years and older, unless good cause is shown, the court shall ask the youth about his desired permanency outcome and consult with the youth about the youth’s current permanency plan;

If there is reason to believe that the child is an Indian child and there has not been a final determination regarding the child’s status as an Indian child, the court shall:

Inquire about the efforts that have been made since the last hearing to determine whether the child is an Indian child; and

Determine that the department is using active efforts to work with all tribes of which the child may be a member to verify whether the child is a member or eligible for membership.

If the child is being treated with psychotropic medication, these additional requirements shall apply:

The department shall report to the court the medication and dosage prescribed for the child and the medical professional who prescribed the medication; and

The court shall inquire as to, and may make any additional inquiry relevant to, the use of psychotropic medication.

Notice of the permanency hearing shall be provided to the parents and other legal guardians, prosecuting attorney or deputy attorney general, guardian ad litem, attorney for the child, the department and foster parents; provided however, that foster parents are not thereby made parties to the child protective act action.

The permanency plan as approved by the court shall be entered into the record as an order of the court. The order may include interim and final deadlines for implementing the permanency plan and finalizing the permanency goal.

For youth with a proposed or current permanency goal of another planned permanent living arrangement, at each permanency hearing the court shall make written, case-specific findings that as of the date of the permanency hearing another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the youth and that there are compelling reasons why it is not in the youth’s best interest to be placed permanently with a parent, in an adoptive placement, in a guardianship, or in the legal custody of the department in a placement with a fit and willing relative, including an adult sibling.

The court may authorize the department to suspend further efforts to reunify the child with the child’s parent, pending further order of the court, when a petition or other motion is filed in a child protection proceeding seeking a determination of the court that aggravated circumstances were present.

§ 16-1620A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 16-1621. Case plan hearing — No finding of aggravated circumstances.

In every case in which the child is determined to be within the jurisdiction of the court and there is no judicial determination that aggravated circumstances were present, the department shall prepare a written case plan, including cases in which the parent(s) is incarcerated. The court shall schedule a case plan hearing to be held within thirty (30) days after the adjudicatory hearing. The case plan shall be filed with the court no later than five (5) days prior to the case plan hearing. Copies of the case plan shall be delivered to the parents and other legal guardians, the prosecuting attorney or deputy attorney general, the guardian ad litem and attorney for the child.

The court shall hold a case plan hearing to determine whether the best interest of the child is served by adopting, rejecting or modifying the case plan proposed by the department.

If there is reason to believe that the child is an Indian child and there has not been a final determination regarding the child’s status as an Indian child, the court shall:

Inquire about the efforts that have been made since the last hearing to determine whether the child is an Indian child; and

Determine that the department is using active efforts to work with all tribes of which the child may be a member to verify whether the child is a member or eligible for membership.

If the child is being treated with psychotropic medication, the court shall inquire as to, and may make any additional inquiry relevant to, the use of psychotropic medication.

Notice of the case plan hearing shall be provided to the parents, and other legal guardians, the prosecuting attorney or deputy attorney general, guardian ad litem, attorney for the child, the department and foster parents. Although foster parents are provided notice of this hearing, they are not parties to the child protective act action.

If the child is placed in the legal custody of the department, the case plan filed by the department shall set forth reasonable efforts that will be made to make it possible for the child to return home. The case plan shall also:

Identify the services to be provided to the child, including services to identify and meet any educational, emotional, physical or developmental needs the child may have, and to assist the child in adjusting to the placement or to ensure the stability of the placement. For youth age fourteen (14) years and older:

Identify the services needed to assist the youth in making the transition to successful adulthood; and

Document the youth’s rights in regard to his education and health, visitation, court participation and receipt of an annual credit report, including a signed acknowledgment by the department that the youth was provided with a written copy of these rights and that the rights were explained to the youth in an age or developmentally appropriate manner;

Address the options for maintaining the child’s connection to the community:

Include connections to individuals with a significant relationship to the child and organizations or community activities with which the child has a significant connection;

Ensure educational stability for the child, including the efforts to keep the child in the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement or the reasons why remaining in that school is not in the best interests of the child;
(iii) Include a visitation plan and identify the need for supervision of visitation and child support;

Document either that siblings were placed together or, if siblings were not placed together, document the efforts made to place the siblings together, the reasons why siblings were not placed together and a plan for ensuring frequent visitation or other ongoing interaction among siblings, unless visitation or ongoing interaction would be contrary to the safety or well-being of one (1) or more of the siblings; and

If there is reason to believe the child is an Indian child and there has been no final determination as to the child’s status as an Indian child, document:

The efforts made to determine whether the child is an Indian child; and

The department’s efforts to work with all tribes of which the child may be a member to verify whether the child is a member or eligible for membership;

Include a goal of reunification and a plan for achieving that goal. The reunification plan shall identify all issues that need to be addressed before the child can safely be returned home without department supervision. The court may specifically identify issues to be addressed by the plan. The reunification plan shall specifically identify the tasks to be completed by the department, each parent or others to address each issue, including services to be made available by the department to the parents and in which the parents are required to participate, and deadlines for completion of each task. The case plan shall state with specificity the role of the department toward each parent. When appropriate, the reunification plan should identify terms for visitation, supervision of visitation and child support;

Include a concurrent permanency goal and a plan for achieving that goal. The concurrent permanency goal may be one (1) of the following: termination of parental rights and adoption, guardianship or, for youth age sixteen (16) years or older only, another planned permanent living arrangement. The concurrent plan shall:

Address all options for permanent placement of the child, including consideration of options for in-state and out-of-state placement of the child;

Address the advantages and disadvantages of each option and include a recommendation as to which option is in the child’s best interest;

Specifically identify the actions necessary to implement the recommended option;

Specifically set forth a schedule for accomplishing the actions necessary to implement the concurrent permanency goal;

Address options for maintaining the child’s connection to the community, including individuals with a significant relationship to the child and organizations or community activities with which the child has a significant connection;

Identify the names of the proposed adoptive parents when known if the permanency goal is termination of parental rights and adoption;

In the case of a child who has attained the age of fourteen (14) years, include the services needed to assist the child to make the transition from foster care to successful adulthood;

For youth with a proposed permanency goal of another permanent planned living arrangement, document:

The intensive, ongoing and, as of the date of the hearing, unsuccessful efforts made to place the youth with a parent in an adoptive placement, in a guardianship, or in the legal custody of the department in a placement with a fit and willing relative, including an adult sibling;

Why another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency goal for the youth and a compelling reason why, as of the date of the case plan hearing, it would not be in the best interest of the child to be placed permanently with a parent, in an adoptive placement, in a guardianship, or in the legal custody of the department in a placement with a fit and willing relative, including an adult sibling;

The steps taken by the department to ensure that the youth’s foster parents or child care institution are following the reasonable and prudent parent standard when making decisions about whether the youth can engage in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural and social activities; and

The opportunities provided to the youth to regularly engage in age or developmentally appropriate activities; and

Identify further investigation necessary to identify or assess other options for permanent placement, to identify actions necessary to implement the recommended placement or to identify options for maintaining the child’s significant connections.

If the child has been placed under protective supervision of the department, the case plan filed by the department shall:

Identify the services to be provided to the child, including services to identify and meet any educational, emotional, physical or developmental needs the child may have, and to assist the child in adjusting to the placement or to ensure the stability of the placement. For youth age fourteen (14) years and older, identify the services needed to assist the youth in making the transition to successful adulthood and document the youth’s rights in regard to his education and health, visitation, court participation and receipt of an annual credit report, including a signed acknowledgment by the department that the youth was provided with a written copy of his rights and that the rights were explained to the youth in an age or developmentally appropriate manner. The plan shall also address options for maintaining the child’s connection to the community, including individuals with a significant relationship to the child and organizations or community activities with which the child has a significant connection;

Identify all issues that need to be addressed to allow the child to remain at home without department supervision. The court may specifically identify issues to be addressed by the plan. The case plan shall specifically identify the tasks to be completed by the department, the parents or others to address each issue, including services to be made available by the department to the parents and in which the parents are required to participate, and deadlines for completion of each task. The plan shall state with specificity the role of the department toward each parent.

The case plan, as approved by the court, shall be entered into the record as an order of the court. The order may include interim and final deadlines for implementing the case plan and finalizing the permanency goal. The court’s order shall provide that reasonable efforts shall be made to reunify the family in a timely manner in accordance with the case plan. Unless the child has been placed under the protective supervision of the department, the court’s order shall also require the department to simultaneously take steps to accomplish the goal of reunification and the concurrent permanency goal.